Nebraska, session 109, LB1060.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1060 LB1060
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Child Placement Services Preservation Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) The State of Nebraska has a critical need to find and retain
safe, loving, and supportive homes for children, especially because the
number of children needing foster care and adoption placement outnumber
the homes available for placement;
(2) In order to serve the best interests of the children of this
state, the State of Nebraska has a longstanding public-private
partnership with a diverse group of faith-based and non-faith-based
organizations that work side by side to find and retain safe, loving, and
supportive homes for children. Significantly, faith-based organizations
have a lengthy history of providing child placement services which
predates government involvement;
(3) Having as many qualified child-placing agencies in Nebraska as
possible is a substantial benefit to the children of Nebraska who are in
need of these placement services and to all of the citizens of Nebraska
because the more qualified agencies taking part in this process there
are, the greater the likelihood that permanent placement can be achieved
for each child; and
(4) In order to preserve the support that child-placing agencies
offer children and families, the government should not take adverse
action against child-placing agencies based on their sincerely held
religious beliefs.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Child Placement Services Preservation
Act:
(1) Adverse action includes, but is not limited to, denying a child-
placing agency's application for funding, refusing to renew an agency's
funding, canceling an agency's funding, declining to enter into a
contract with an agency, refusing to renew a contract with an agency,
canceling a contract with an agency, denying issuance of a license to an
-2-

LB1060 LB1060
2026 2026
agency, refusing to renew an agency's license, canceling an agency's
license, taking an enforcement action against an agency, treating an
agency less favorably than similarly situated agencies in regard to
participation in a government program, or taking any other action that
materially alters the terms or conditions of an agency's funding,
contract, or license;
(2) Child placement service means arranging the placement of
children with foster care and adoptive parents, including placement,
promoting foster care and adoption, and recruiting, screening, and
training the foster care and adoptive parents;
(3) Child-placing agency or agency has the same meaning as in
section 71-1926;
(4) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
and
(5) State includes the state, its agencies, and its political
subdivisions.
Sec. 4. (1) To the fullest extent permitted by state and federal
law, a child-placing agency shall not be required to provide or
facilitate any child placement service if the service conflicts with, or
provide or facilitate any child placement service under circumstances
that conflict with, the child-placing agency's sincerely held religious
beliefs.
(2) If a child-placing agency declines to provide or facilitate any
child placement service under subsection (1) of this section, the child-
placing agency shall promptly provide the person seeking such service
with at least one of the following:
(a) Contact information for another child-placing agency that is
capable of providing the declined service;
(b) A list of other child-placing agencies capable of providing the
declined service which includes contact information for such agencies; or
(c) A link to a web page on the department's web site that includes
-3-

LB1060 LB1060
2026 2026
a list of other child-placing agencies capable of providing the declined
service and contact information for the agencies.
Sec. 5. To the fullest extent permitted by state and federal law,
the state shall not take an adverse action against a child-placing agency
because the agency declines to provide or facilitate a child placement
service that conflicts with the child-placing agency's sincerely held
religious beliefs.
Sec. 6. A child-placing agency aggrieved by a violation of section
5 of this act may assert that violation as a defense in any
administrative or judicial proceeding.
Sec. 7. The Child Placement Services Preservation Act shall be
construed liberally so as to effectuate its purposes.
Sec. 8. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
-4-